Illinois, session 104th, HB2344.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 9-25 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/9-25)7    Sec. 9-25. Township property record cards. In counties 8under township organization, the township assessors and 9multi-township assessors shall allow the supervisor of 10assessments to make a duplicate copy of any or all records 11compiled and maintained by the township assessor and 12multi-township assessor. The supervisor of assessments shall 13make and maintain a complete set of property record cards. The 14township or multi-township assessor shall supply the 15supervisor of assessments with a copy of all new property 16record cards as they are added to the tax rolls. In counties 17with a population of more than 700,000 residents and fewer 18than 725,000 residents according to the most recent federal 19decennial census, on and after January 1, 2026, at the request 20of the supervisor of assessments, property record cards 21supplied by the townships shall be in a digital format 22compatible with the system used by the supervisor of 23assessments.   HB2344- 2 -LRB104 02972 HLH 12989 b1(Source: P.A. 84-837; 88-455.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.